Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-47] Other law enforcement or
regulatory authority. This chapter shall not:

(1) Preempt the authority or relieve the duty of
other law enforcement or regulatory agencies to investigate, examine, and
prosecute suspected violations of law;

(2) Preempt, supersede, or limit any provision of any
state securities law or any rule, order, or notice issued thereunder;

(3) Prevent or prohibit a person from voluntarily disclosing
information concerning life settlement fraud to a law enforcement or regulatory
agency other than the insurance division; or

(4) Limit the powers granted elsewhere by the laws of
this State to the commissioner or the insurance fraud investigations unit to
investigate and examine possible violations of law and to take appropriate action
against wrongdoers. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next